Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2208.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-194.02, to read: START_STATUTE41-194.02. Health profession regulatory boards; violations; attorney general investigation; referral; report; JLBC review; recommendations; definition A. At the request of one or more members of the legislature, the attorney general shall investigate any action taken by a health profession regulatory board that the member or members allege violates state law, rules or the Constitution of Arizona. b. If the attorney general determines that a conflict of interest exists that prohibits the attorney general from investigating a complaint or action taken by a health profession regulatory board, the attorney general shall refer the complaint to a county attorney for investigation.  The referral shall be made on a random basis using a method that ensures impartiality and prevents the attorney general from selecting a specific county attorney. The attorney general shall maintain a record of all referrals made pursuant to this section, including the method of randomization used, to ensure compliance with this requirement. c. The attorney general or, if applicable, the county attorney who receives the referral pursuant to subsection b of this section shall make a written report of findings and conclusions as a result of the investigation within thirty days after receipt of the request and shall provide a copy of the report to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the members of the joint legislative budget committee, the member or members of the legislature making the original request and the secretary of state. D. If the attorney general or, if applicable, the county attorney who received the referral pursuant to subsection B of this section determines that the health profession regulatory board violated or may have violated a state law, rules or the constitution of Arizona, the joint legislative budget committee shall review the written report WITHIN ninety days after receiving the written report and make recommendations to the legislature regarding any recommended budgetary changes. E. For the purposes of this section, "health profession regulatory board" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3201. END_STATUTE